Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5253.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 27-20.11-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-20.11 entitled "Autism
Spectrum Disorders" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-20.11-3. Scope of coverage.
(a) Benefits under this section shall include coverage for pharmaceuticals, applied behavior
analysis, physical therapy, speech therapy, psychology, psychiatric and occupational therapy
services for the treatment of autism spectrum disorders, as defined in the most recent edition of the
DSM. Provided, however:
(1) Coverage for physical therapy, speech therapy, and occupational therapy and
psychology, psychiatry, and pharmaceutical services shall be, to the extent such services are a
covered benefit for other diseases and conditions under such policy; and
(2) Applied behavior analysis.
(b) Benefits under this section shall continue until the covered individual reaches age
fifteen (15); provided, however, on or after January 1, 2026, no benefits shall be limited by the age
of the covered individual.
(c) The healthcare benefits outlined in this chapter apply only to services delivered within
the state of Rhode Island; provided, that all health insurance carriers shall be required to provide
coverage for those benefits mandated by this chapter outside of the state of Rhode Island where it
can be established through a pre-authorization process that the required services are not available
in the state of Rhode Island from a provider in the health insurance carrier’s network.

SECTION 2. Chapter 27-20.11 of the General Laws entitled "Autism Spectrum Disorders"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-20.11-9. Applied behavioral analysis reimbursement rates.
(d) Every group health insurance contract, or every group hospital or medical expense
insurance policy, plan, or group policy delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this state, by
any health insurance carrier, on or after January 1, 2026, shall reimburse certified, applied behavior
analysis providers, who are designated by the executive office of health and human services, for
applied behavior analysis services at rates of reimbursement equal to, or greater than, the prevailing
integrated state Medicaid rate for applied behavior analysis services as established by the executive
office of health and human services. The provisions of this section shall not apply to contracts,
plans, or group policies subject to the small employer health insurance availability act, medical
assistance or subject to the individual health insurance coverage act.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000698
========
LC000698 - Page 2 of 3